Utah statutes.
4-38-4.   Powers and duties of commission.

(1)  The commission shall:

(a)  license, regulate, and supervise all persons involved in the racing of horses as provided in this chapter;

(b)  license, regulate, and supervise all recognized race meets held in this state under the terms of this chapter;

(c)  cause the various places where recognized race meets are held to be visited and inspected at least once a year;

(d)  assist in procuring public liability insurance coverage from a private insurance company for those licensees unable to otherwise obtain the insurance required under this chapter;

(e)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to govern race meets, including rules:

(i)  to resolve scheduling conflicts and settle disputes among licensees;

(ii)  to supervise, discipline, suspend, fine, and bar from events all persons required to be licensed by this chapter; and

(iii)  to hold, conduct, and operate all recognized race meets conducted pursuant to this chapter;

(f)  determine which persons participating, directly or indirectly, in recognized race meets require licenses;

(g)  announce the time, place, and duration of recognized race meets for which licenses shall be required; and

(h)  establish reasonable fees for all licenses provided for under this chapter.

(2)  The commission may:

(a)  grant, suspend, or revoke licenses issued under this chapter;

(b)  impose fines as provided in this chapter;

(c)  access criminal history record information for all licensees and commission employees; and

(d)  exclude from any racetrack facility in this state any person who the commission considers detrimental to the best interests of racing or any person who violates any provisions of this chapter or any rule or order of the commission.

